src/fst/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ateq
Akutaĸ+Dial/Vgr:Akutaĸ Z1Mask_taqZ ;
Alluaq+Dial/Vgr:Alluaq Z1Mask_iaqZ ;
Amaroĸ+Dial/Ngr:Amaroĸ Z1Mask_AĸajaroĸZ ;
Ameq+Dial/Vgr:Ameq Z1Fem_meqZ ;
Aput:Aput Z1Fem_tptZ ;
Aput:Aput Z1Mask_tptZ ;
Arĸalôraĸ+Dial/Vgr:Arĸalôraĸ Z1Mask_araqZ ;
Arnaviaq+Dial/Vgr:Arnaviaq Z1Fem_iaqZ ;
Arsugaq:Arsugaq Z1Fem_gaqZ ;
Atsâraĸ+Dial/Vgr:Atsâraĸ Z1Fem_araqZ ;
Avalequt+Dial/Vgr:Avalequt Z1Fem_tptZ ;
De% Konservative Z1ateqpropPZ ;
Ellen-Margrethe:Ellen-Margrethe Z1Fem_ateqZ ;
Erinaq+Dial/Sgr:Erinaq Z1Mask_naqZ ;
Erinaĸ+Dial/Sgr:Erinaĸ Z1Mask_naqZ ;
Esajas:Esajas ZMask_oqsZ ;
Filologosi Z1ateqpropZ ;
Gabrieli:Gabrieli Z1Mask_GrlateqZ ;
Genesaretip ZpossessorSZ ;
Gertinnguaq:Gertinnguaq Z1Mask_nnguaqZ ;
Grækerit ZpossessorPZ ;
Habib:Habib ZFem_oqsZ ;
Iista:Iista Z1Fem_GrlateqZ ;
Imaneĸ+Dial/Vgr:Imaneĸ Z2Mask_niqZ ;
Inaluaq+Dial/Vgr:Inaluaq Z1Mask_gaqZ ;
Inuaĸ+Dial/Vgr:Inuaĸ Z1Mask_iaqZ ;
Inukuaĸ+Dial/Sgr:Inukuaĸ Z1Fem_iaĸZ ;
Isaroĸ+Dial/Vgr:Isaroĸ Z1Mask_AĸajaroĸZ ;
Ivalorsuaq+Dial/Ngr:Ivalorsuaq Z2Fem_suaqZ ;
Ivernâjik+Dial/Egr:Ivernâjik Z2Fem_kZ ;
Jeppe:Jeppe Z1Mask_ateqZ ;
K'arasaĸ+Dial/Vgr:K'arasaĸ Z1Mask_saqZ ;
K'ilagoĸ+Dial/Vgr:K'ilagoĸ Z1Mask_goqZ ;
K'ilugoĸ+Dial/Vgr:K'ilugoĸ Z1Mask_iaĸZ ;
K'issugssuaĸ+Dial/Ngr:K'issugssuaĸ Z2Mask_suaqZ ;
K'ugdlugiaĸ+Dial/Vgr:K'ugdlugiaĸ Z1Mask_iaĸZ ;
K'usoraĸ+Dial/Vgr:K'usoraĸ Z1Mask_araqZ ;
K'âtak+Dial/Egr:K'âtak Z2Mask_kZ ;
Kajâraĸ+Dial/Vgr:Kajâraĸ Z1Fem_araqZ ;
Kanioq+Dial/Vgr:Kanioq Z1Mask_ioqZ ;
Kanioĸ+Dial/Vgr:Kanioĸ Z1Mask_ioqZ ;
Ken:Ken ZMask_oqsZ ;
Kitigaq+Dial/Vgr:Kitigaq Z1Fem_gaqZ ;
Kâsipat:Kâsipat Z1Mask_GrlateqZ ;
Kúko+Dial/Egr+Dial/Vgr:Kúko Z1Fem_ateqZ ;
Lemueli Z1ateqpropZ ;
Magseránguaĸ+Dial/Ngr:Magseránguaĸ Z1Fem_nnguaqZ ;
Magsseránguaĸ+Dial/Ngr:Magsseránguaĸ Z1Mask_nnguaqZ ;
Maibritt:Maibritt ZFem_oqsZ ;
Makiuarneĸ+Dial/Sgr:Makiuarneĸ Z2Fem_niqZ ;
Mamagoĸ+Dial/Vgr:Mamagoĸ Z1Mask_goqZ ;
Mamiaĸ+Dial/Egr:Mamiaĸ Z1Fem_iaĸZ ;
Marriortup ZpossessorSZ ;
Martina:Martina Z1Fem_GrlateqZ ;
Mássagaĸ+Dial/Vgr:Mássagaĸ Z1Mask_gaqZ ;
Naalakkersuisut% Siulittaasuata% Naalakkersuisoqarfia+Sem/inst:Naalakkersuisut% Siulittaasuata% Naalakkersuisoqarfia ZpossessumZ ;
Nanoq:Nanoq Z1Mask_noqZ ;
Nanoq:Nanoq Z1Mask_noqZ ;
Napparut+Dial/Vgr:Napparut Z1Mask_tptZ ;
Nasaq+Dial/Vgr:Nasaq Z1Mask_saqZ ;
Niaqoq+Dial/Vgr:Niaqoq Z1Mask_qoqZ ;
Niaĸoĸ+Dial/Vgr:Niaĸoĸ Z1Fem_qoqZ ;
Niaĸoĸ+Dial/Vgr:Niaĸoĸ Z1Mask_qoqZ ;
Nukagpe+Dial/Vgr:Nukagpe Z1Mask_ateqZ ;
Nunatta% Eqqumiitsulianik% Saqqummersitsivia ZpossessumSZ ;
Nutaqqak+Dial/Egr:Nutaqqak Z2Fem_kZ ;
Oĸûtaĸ+Dial/Vgr:Oĸûtaĸ Z1Mask_taqZ ;
Oqqisaat+Dial/Egr:Oqqisaat Z1Mask_tptZ ;
Palleq+Dial/Vgr+Dial/Ngr:Palleq Z2Mask_niqZ ;
Panêraĸ+Dial/Vgr:Panêraĸ Z1Fem_araĸZ ;
Pikêra:Pikêra Z1Fem_araĸZ ;
Pilutaq+Dial/Vgr:Pilutaq Z1Mask_taqZ ;
Pilutaq+Dial/Vgr:Pilutaq Z1Fem_taqZ ;
Pingajuat:Pingajuat Z1Mask_atZ ;
Pooruseq+Dial/Vgr:Pooruseq Z1Mask_seqZ ;
Pôruseĸ+Dial/Vgr:Pôruseĸ Z1Mask_seqZ ;
Qarasaq+Dial/Vgr:Qarasaq Z1Mask_saqZ ;
Qimmeruaq+Dial/Vgr:Qimmeruaq Z1Fem_iaqZ ;
Qungaseq+Dial/Vgr:Qungaseq Z1Mask_seqZ ;
Rick:Rick ZMask_oqsZ ;
Sapangaq+Dial/Sgr:Sapangaq Z1Fem_ngaqZ ;
Sapangaĸ+Dial/Sgr:Sapangaĸ Z1Fem_ngaqZ ;
Sauneĸ+Dial/Ngr:Sauneĸ Z2Fem_neqZ ;
Savat ZpossessorPZ ;
Seqineq+Dial/Vgr:Seqineq Z2Fem_neqZ ;
Shirley:Shirley Z1Fem_ateqZ ;
Sianeq+Dial/Vgr:Sianeq Z2Mask_neqZ ;
SIK-p% Inuusuttai:SIK-p% Inuusuttaq ZpossessumPZ ;
Skifte Z1ateqpropZ ;
Stauning% Alper:Stauning% Alpe Z1geopropPZ ;
Stauning% Alper+Orth/Alt:Staunings% Alpe Z1geopropPZ ;
Sákak+Dial/Vgr:Sákak Z2Mask_kZ ;
Taleroq+Dial/Vgr:Taleroq Z1Fem_qoqZ ;
Tuneq+Dial/Ngr:Tuneq Z2Mask_neqZ ; !?Skal den være Torngup? Eller?
Tusagassiuinermi% Sulisut% Peqatigiiffiat ZpossessumZ ;
Tuukutaq+Dial/Sgr:Tuukutaq Z1Mask_GrlateqZ ;
Tôrtínguaĸ:Tôrtínguaĸ Z1Fem_nnguaqZ ;
Ujarneq+Dial/Egr+Dial/Vgr:Ujarneq Z2Fem_niqZ ;
Ukaleq+Dial/Vgr:Ukaleq Z1Fem_leqZ ;
Ukaleq+Dial/Vgr:Ukaleq Z1Mask_leqZ ;
Ukaleĸ+Dial/Vgr:Ukaleĸ Z1Fem_leqZ ;
Ukaleĸ+Dial/Vgr:Ukaleĸ Z1Mask_leqZ ;
Uluîsa:Uluîsa Z1Fem_GrlateqZ ;
Valêriuse:Valêriuse Z1Mask_ateqZ ;
Âjakorssuaĸ+Dial/Ngr:Âjakorssuaĸ Z2Mask_suaqZ ;
Ârĸat+Dial/Vgr:Ârĸat Z1Fem_tptZ ;
Ítuat:Ítuat Z1Mask_atZ ;
Ítússaarsuaĸ+Dial/Ngr:Ítússaarsuaĸ Z2Fem_suaqZ ;
Fuglsbølle Z1geopropZ ;
Larsbjørnsstræde Z1geopropZ ;
Nunatta% Qitornai:Nunatta% Qitornaq ZpossessumPZ ;
Qeqqata% Kommunia+Err/Sub:Qeqqata% Kommunea   ZpossessumSZ ;
Vognmagergade Z1geopropZ ;
